Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-936
Lawful occupation, defined.

Lawful occupation means a course of conduct, a pursuit, or a profession that includes the sale of goods or services that are not themselves illegal to sell irrespective of whether the individual selling them is subject to an occupational regulation.

Laws 2018, LB299, § 4.